Connecticut, session 2026, SB00119.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsections (a) to (c), inclusive, of section 42-221 of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes are repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A dealer selling a used motor vehicle [which has a cash purchase
price of three thousand dollars or more] that is less than ten years of age
shall not exclude, modify, disclaim or limit implied warranties on the
motor vehicle.
(b) Each contract entered into by a dealer for the sale to a consumer
of a used motor vehicle [which has a cash purchase price of three
thousand dollars or more but less than five thousand dollars,] that is less
than ten years of age shall include an express warranty, covering the full
cost of both parts and labor, that the vehicle is mechanically operational
and sound and will remain so for at least [thirty] sixty days or [one
thousand five hundred] three thousand miles of operation, whichever
period ends first, in the absence of damage resulting from an automobile
SB119 / File No. 170 1

SB119 File No. 170
accident or from misuse of the vehicle by the consumer. [Each contract
entered into by a dealer for the sale of a used motor vehicle which has a
cash purchase price of five thousand dollars or more shall include an
express warranty, covering the full cost of both parts and labor, that the
vehicle is mechanically operational and sound and will remain so for at
least sixty days or three thousand miles of operation, whichever period
ends first, in the absence of damage resulting from an automobile
accident or from misuse of the vehicle by the consumer.] A dealer may
not limit a warranty covered by this section by the use of such phrases
as "fifty-fifty", "labor only", "drive train only", or other words attempting
to disclaim [his] the dealer's responsibility.
(c) The provisions of this section shall not apply to: (1) The [sale of a
used motor vehicle having a cash purchase price of less than three
thousand dollars; (2) the] sale of [such] used motor vehicles between
dealers; or [(3)] (2) the sale of a used motor vehicle [which] that is [seven]
ten years of age or older, which age shall be calculated from the first day
in January of the designated model year of such vehicle.
Sec. 2. Subsection (a) of section 42-224 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) A used motor vehicle may be sold "as is" by a dealer only [if its
cash purchase price is less than three thousand dollars or] if such used
motor vehicle is [seven] ten years of age or older, which age shall be
calculated from the first day in January of the designated model year of
such vehicle.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 42-221(a) to (c)
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 42-224(a)
GL Joint Favorable
SB119 / File No. 170 2

SB119 File No. 170
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Motor Vehicle Dept. TF - Potential Minimal Minimal
Revenue Gain
Note: TF=Transportation Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which modifies used vehicle warranty requirements, results
in potential minimal revenue gain to the extent that additional civil
penalties are imposed from violations.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to any civil penalties imposed.
SB119 / File No. 170 3

SB119 File No. 170
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 119
AN ACT CONCERNING USED MOTOR VEHICLE WARRANTIES.